Maryland, session 2026, SB0005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
13.
(a) (1) In case of death, disqualification, resignation, refusal to act, expulsion,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0005*

SENATE BILL 5
or removal from the county or city for which [he] THE INDIVIDUAL shall have been elected,
of any [person] INDIVIDUAL who shall have been chosen as a Delegate or Senator, or in
case of a tie between two or more such qualified [persons] INDIVIDUALS, the Governor
shall appoint [a person] AN INDIVIDUAL to fill such vacancy from [a person] AN
INDIVIDUAL whose name shall be submitted to [him] THE GOVERNOR in writing, within
[thirty] 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy, by the Central Committee of the
political party, if any, with which the Delegate or Senator, so vacating, had been affiliated,
at the time of the last election or appointment of the vacating Senator or Delegate, in the
County or District from which [he or she] THE VACATING SENATOR OR DELEGATE was
appointed or elected, provided that the appointee shall be of the same political party, if any,
as was that of the Delegate or Senator, whose office is to be filled, at the time of the last
election or appointment of the vacating Delegate or Senator, and it shall be the duty of the
Governor to make said appointment within [fifteen] 15 days after the submission thereof
to [him] THE GOVERNOR.
(2) If a name is not submitted by the Central Committee within [thirty] 30
days after the occurrence of the vacancy, the Governor within another period of [fifteen] 15
days shall appoint [a person] AN INDIVIDUAL, who shall be affiliated with the same
political party, if any as was that of the Delegate or Senator, whose office is to be filled, at
the time of the last election or appointment of the vacating Delegate or Senator, and who
is otherwise properly qualified to hold the office of Delegate or Senator in the District or
County.
(3) In the event there is no Central Committee in the County or District
from which said vacancy is to be filled, the Governor shall within [fifteen] 15 days after the
occurrence of such vacancy appoint [a person] AN INDIVIDUAL, from the same political
party, if any, as that of the vacating Delegate or Senator, at the time of the last election or
appointment of the vacating Senator or Delegate, who is otherwise properly qualified to
hold the office of Delegate or Senator in such District or County.
[(4) In every case when any person is so appointed by the Governor, his
appointment shall be deemed to be for the unexpired term of the person whose office has
become vacant.]
(b) In addition, and in submitting a name to the Governor to fill a vacancy in a
Legislative or Delegate district, as the case may be, in any of the [twenty–three] 23
counties of Maryland, the Central Committee or committees shall follow these provisions:
(1) If the vacancy occurs in a district having the same boundaries as a
county, the Central Committee of the county shall submit the name of a resident of the
district.
(2) If the vacancy occurs in a district which has boundaries comprising a
portion of one county, the Central Committee of that county shall submit the name of a
resident of the district.

SENATE BILL 5 3
(3) If the vacancy occurs in a district which has boundaries comprising a
portion or all of two or more counties, the Central Committee of each county involved shall
have one vote for submitting the name of a resident of the district; and if there is a tie vote
between or among the Central Committees, the list of names there proposed shall be
submitted to the Governor, and [he] THE GOVERNOR shall make the appointment from
the list.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE UNTIL A
SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO FILL THE
REMAINDER OF THE TERM.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE
FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE TERM IF THE VACANCY OCCURS AFTER THE DATE THAT
IS 55 DAYS BEFORE THE DEADLINE FOR FILING CERTIFICATES OF CANDIDACY FOR
THE REGULAR STATEWIDE ELECTION THAT IS HELD IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE
TERM.
(3) IF THE VACANCY OCCURS ON OR BEFORE THE DATE THAT IS 55
DAYS BEFORE THE DEADLINE FOR FILING CERTIFICATES OF CANDIDACY FOR THE
REGULAR STATEWIDE ELECTION THAT IS HELD IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE TERM,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL ISSUE A PROCLAMATION IMMEDIATELY AFTER THE
OCCURRENCE OF THE VACANCY DECLARING THAT A SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION
AND A SPECIAL GENERAL ELECTION SHALL BE HELD AT THE SAME TIME AS THE
REGULAR STATEWIDE PRIMARY ELECTION AND REGULAR STATEWIDE GENERAL
ELECTION THAT ARE HELD IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE TERM.
Article XVII – Quadrennial Elections
2.
(A) Except [for a special election that may be authorized to fill a vacancy in a
County Council or a vacancy in the office of chief executive officer or County Executive,
under Article XI–A, Section 3 of the Constitution] AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, elections by qualified voters for State and county officers shall be held on
the Tuesday next after the first Monday of November, in the year [nineteen hundred and
twenty–six] 1926, and on the same day in every fourth year thereafter.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A SPECIAL ELECTION:
(1) TO FILL A VACANCY IN A COUNTY COUNCIL OR A VACANCY IN THE
OFFICE OF CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OR COUNTY EXECUTIVE UNDER ARTICLE
XI–A, § 3 OF THE CONSTITUTION; OR

SENATE BILL 5
(2) TO FILL A VACANCY IN THE OFFICE OF DELEGATE OR SENATOR IN
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER ARTICLE III, § 13(C) OF THE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.